Utah statutes.
77-32a-2.   Costs -- What constitute.

Costs shall be limited to expenses specially incurred by the state or any political subdivision in investigating, searching for, apprehending, and prosecuting the defendant, including attorney fees of counsel assigned to represent the defendant, interpreter fees, and investigators' fees.  Costs cannot include expenses inherent in providing a constitutionally guaranteed trial or expenditures in connection with the maintenance and operation of government agencies that must be made by the public irrespective of specific violations of law.  Costs cannot include attorneys' fees for prosecuting attorneys.



Amended by Chapter 21, 1999 General Session

